Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-8,103
Interstate bridges; department; construction and maintenance.

The department shall be responsible for the construction and maintenance of that portion of any interstate bridge located within the State of Nebraska, and shall have the power and authority to enter into agreements with an adjoining state for the joint construction or maintenance of the whole of any such bridge, as authorized by section 39-8,107.

Laws 1959, c. 175, § 13, p. 638.